Washington statutes.
RCW 26.34.060

Jurisdiction of courts.

Any court having jurisdiction to place delinquent children may place such a child in an institution of or in another state pursuant to Article VI of the Interstate Compact on the Placement of Children and shall retain jurisdiction as provided in Article V thereof.

[ 1971 ex.s. c 168 s 6.]